Utah statutes.
19-3-311.   Length of license.

(1)  Any construction and operating license shall be issued for a term established by department rule, but the term may not be longer than 20 years.

(2)  The term of the license may be extended beyond 20 years only by approval of the department, the Legislature, and the governor.



Enacted by Chapter 348, 1998 General Session

